North Carolina, session 2025, HB812.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the University of North Carolina at
Pembroke (UNCP) to construct a presidential library in honor of President Donald John Trump.
UNCP may partner with the federal National Archives and Records Administration to the extent
necessary to complete the project.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H812-v-1*